Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,132
School store; authorized.

The Public Elementary and Secondary Student Fee Authorization Act does not preclude operation of a school store in which students may purchase food, beverages, and personal or consumable items. A school store need not have a permanent physical presence and may consist of providing order forms for students to voluntarily purchase items from the school or another vendor.

Laws 2002, LB 1172, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 8.